Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 2. Programs of Instruction.

§ 23.1-901.
Programs on economics education and financial literacy.

Public institutions of higher education shall promote the development of student life skills by including the principles of economics education and financial literacy within an existing general education course, the freshman orientation process, or another appropriate venue. Such principles may include instruction concerning personal finance such as credit card use, opening and managing an account in a financial institution, completing a loan application, managing student loans, savings and investments, consumer rights and responsibilities, predatory lending practices and interest rates, consumer fraud, identity theft and protection, and debt management.

The Council shall encourage private institutions of higher education to include such principles as part of their student orientation programs.

History.

2005, c. 741, § 23-9.2:3.5; 2007, c. 47; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-902.
Education preparation programs offered by institutions of higher education.

Education preparation programs offered by public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education shall meet the requirements for accreditation and program approval as prescribed by the Board of Education in its regulations.

The Board of Education may prescribe in its regulations requirements for admission to approved education preparation programs in the Commonwealth.

Any candidate who fails to achieve the minimum score established by the Board of Education may be denied entrance into an education preparation program on the basis of such failure, but any such candidate who gains entrance and enrolls in an education preparation program shall have the opportunity to address all deficiencies.

Education preparation programs offered by public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education shall ensure that, as a condition of degree completion, each student enrolled in the education preparation program receives instruction on positive behavior interventions and supports; crisis prevention and de-escalation; the use of physical restraint and seclusion, consistent with regulations of the Board of Education; and appropriate alternative methods to reduce and prevent the need for the use of physical restraint and seclusion.

History.

2006, cc. 27, 349, § 23-9.2:3.6; 2016, c. 588; 2019, cc. 63, 407; 2020, c. 870.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 870, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 63 and 407 are identical, and in subsection B, deleted the first sentence, which read: “As provided in § 22.1-298.2, the Board of Education shall prescribe an assessment of basic skills for individuals seeking entry into an approved education preparation program and shall establish a minimum passing score for such assessment” and deleted “other” preceding “requirements” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 870 added subsection D.

§ 23.1-902.1.
(For Expiration Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 559, 757,, cl. 2) Education preparation programs; reading specialists; dyslexia.

Each education preparation program offered by a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education that leads to a degree, concentration, or certificate for reading specialists shall include a program of coursework and other training in the identification of and the appropriate interventions, accommodations, and teaching techniques for students with dyslexia or a related disorder. Such program shall (i) include coursework in the constructs and pedagogy underlying remediation of reading, spelling, and writing and (ii) require reading specialists to demonstrate mastery of an evidence-based, structured literacy instructional approach that includes explicit, systematic, sequential, and cumulative instruction.

History.

2018, cc. 282, 588.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 549 and
550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

Acts
2022, c. 757, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 549 and 550 are identical, and added subsections A and B; redesignated section as subsection C, subsequently designated as subsection C by the Virginia Code Commission; and substituted “mastery of science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction, including appropriate application of instructional supports and services and reading literacy interventions to ensure reading proficiency.” for “mastery of an evidence-based, structured literacy instructional approach that includes explicit, systematic, sequential, and cumulative instruction.” in clause (ii) of subsection E.

The 2022 amendment by c. 757, added subsections A and B and designated the section as subsection C, subsequently redesignated as subsections C, D and E by the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 23.1-902.1.
(For Effective Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 559, 757, cl. 2) Education preparation programs; coursework; audit.

As used in this section, “evidence-based literacy instruction” and “science-based reading research” have the same meanings as provided in § 22.1-1.

Each education preparation program offered by a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education or alternative certification program that provides training for any individual seeking (i) initial licensure with an endorsement in early/primary education preschool through grade three, elementary education preschool through grade six, special education general curriculum kindergarten through grade 12, special education deaf and hard of hearing preschool through grade 12, or special education blindness/visual impairments preschool through grade 12 or (ii) a certificate or microcredential in early literacy or literacy coaching shall provide a program of coursework and require such students to demonstrate mastery in science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction.

Each education preparation program offered by a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education that provides training for any student seeking initial licensure by the Board of Education shall:

Include a program of coursework and require all such students to demonstrate mastery in science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction. Each such program of coursework and the student mastery required to be demonstrated therein shall be consistent with definitions and expectations established by the Board of Education and the Department of Education after consultation with a commission consisting of independent literacy experts and stakeholders with knowledge of science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction that has reviewed the requirements established in subdivision 6 of 8VAC20-23-130, subdivision 6 of 8VAC20-23-190, subdivision 2 a of 8VAC20-23-350, 8VAC20-23-510 through 8VAC20-23-580, and 8VAC20-23-660; and

For any such student seeking initial licensure by the Board of Education as a teacher with an endorsement in early childhood, elementary education, or special education or with an endorsement as a reading specialist, ensure that reading coursework and field practice opportunities are a significant focus of the education preparation program.

The Department of Education shall audit at least once every seven years each education preparation program, in alignment with each program’s accreditation cycle, for compliance with the requirements set forth in subsection A.

Each education preparation program offered by a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education that leads to a degree, concentration, endorsement, or certificate for reading specialists shall include a program of coursework and other training in the identification of and the appropriate interventions, accommodations, and teaching techniques for students with dyslexia or a related disorder. Such program shall (i) include coursework in the constructs and pedagogy underlying remediation of reading, spelling, and writing and (ii) require reading specialists to demonstrate mastery of science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction, including appropriate application of instructional supports and services and reading literacy interventions to ensure reading proficiency.

History.

2018, cc. 282, 588; 2022, cc. 549, 550, 757.

§ 23.1-903.
Distance learning.

Each public institution of higher education shall include in its strategic plan information indicating to what extent, if any, it will use distance learning to expand access to, improve the quality of, and minimize the cost of education at such institution. For institutions that use distance learning or plan to use distance learning in the future, such information shall include the degree to which distance learning will be integrated into the curriculum, benchmarks for measuring such integration, and a schedule for the evaluation of distance learning courses.

The Council shall assist the governing board of each public institution of higher education in the development of such information.

History.

2004, c. 146, § 23-9.2:7; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-903.1.
Study abroad programs.

As used in this section, “study abroad program” means a program sponsored, offered, or approved for credit by an institution of higher education in which program participants travel outside the United States in connection with an educational experience.

The Council shall develop guidelines for study abroad programs.

History.

2016, c. 572.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 572, enacted former § 23-9.2:19, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 enactment by c. 572 has been given effect in this section as set out above.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2016.

§ 23.1-903.2.
Medical school; rotation requirement.

Any public institution of higher education that awards medical degrees shall create and support at least one clinical rotation in a hospital or clinic located in a medically underserved area of the state as determined by the Virginia Department of Health, in an area of the state that has an unemployment rate of one and one-half times the statewide average unemployment rate, or in a locality with a population of 50,000 or less in the Commonwealth.

History.

2016, c. 691.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 691, enacted former § 23-9.2:3.11, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 enactment by c. 691 has been given effect in this section as set out above.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2016.

§ 23.1-903.3.
Mortuary science education; practical experience requirement.

Every public institution of higher education that offers a degree in mortuary science shall require students to complete practical experience in the areas of funeral service and embalming prior to graduation from such program.

History.

2018, c. 186.

§ 23.1-903.4.
Innovative Internship Fund and Program.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Innovative Internship Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated for such purpose and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of the Innovative Internship Program established pursuant to subsection B. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Council.

There is hereby established the Innovative Internship Program (the Program). The purpose of the Program is to expand paid or credit-bearing student internship and other work-based learning opportunities in collaboration with Virginia employers. The Program comprises institutional grants and a statewide initiative to facilitate the readiness of students, employers, and institutions of higher education to participate in internship and other work-based learning opportunities.

In administering the statewide initiative, the Council shall (i) engage stakeholders from business and industry, secondary and higher education, economic development, and state agencies and entities that are successfully engaging employers or successfully operating internship programs; (ii) explore strategies in Virginia and elsewhere on successful institutional, regional, statewide or sector-based internship programs; (iii) gather data on current institutional internship practices, scale, and outcomes; (iv) develop internship readiness educational resources, delivery methods, certification procedures, and outreach and awareness activities for employer partners, students, and institutional career development personnel; (v) pursue shared services or other efficiency initiatives, including technological solutions; and (vi) create a process to track key measures of performance.

The Council shall establish eligibility criteria, including requirements for matching funds, for institutional grants. Such grants shall be used to accomplish one or more of the following goals: (i) support state or regional workforce needs; (ii) support initiatives to attract and retain talent in the Commonwealth; (iii) support research and research commercialization in sectors and clusters targeted for development; (iv) support regional economic growth and diversification plans; (v) enhance the job readiness of students; (vi) enhance higher education affordability and timely completion for Virginia students; or (vii) further the objectives of increasing the tech talent pipeline.

The Council shall partner with the Office of Education and Labor Market Alignment to collect and utilize data that includes the gaps that are most significant in hindering the Commonwealth from achieving the goals listed in subdivision 2. The Council and the Office of Education and Labor Market Alignment shall identify, at minimum: (i) state or regional workforce needs for which the lack of work-based learning opportunities is negatively impacting the success of regional economic growth and diversification plans and (ii) degree programs, the graduates of which describe themselves as underemployed, that would benefit from incorporating work-based learning into the curriculum. The Council and the Office of Education and Labor Market Alignment shall use the needs and degree programs identified in this subdivision to collaboratively determine priorities for: (a) using the portion of student financial aid authorized by the budget to be awarded as grants to students participating in work-based learning; (b) redesigning of curricula at public institutions of higher education; (c) garnering regional support and services to ensure the readiness of students and employers; (d) awarding grants to institutions of higher education to ensure their readiness to support students through detailed planning and implementation of best practices for scaling work-based learning; (e) providing or raising funds to provide matching funds so that students with limited resources, who have traditionally participated in the Program at lower rates, may intern at small Virginia-based employers; and (f) enhancing data collection and analysis.

History.

2019, cc. 794, 795; 2022, c. 420.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 420 added subdivision B 3.